Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.140

Board may draw from health professions account.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, rule or regulation, the board may draw from the health professions account on vouchers approved by the secretary of health, so much money as is necessary to carry into effect, to administer, and to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 3 s 141; 1983 c 168 s 9; 1979 c 158 s 50; 1975 1st ex.s. c 69 s 12; 1963 c 25 s 14.]

NOTES:

Health professions account: RCW 43.70.320.